Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.126.020

Program established—Office duties.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the Native American apprentice assistance program is established and shall be administered by the office. In administering the program, the office has the following duties:

(a) Publicize the program;

(b) Award assistance to eligible participants according to rules and guidelines adopted beginning with the year 2025; and

(c) Adopt any necessary rules and guidelines for the program in consultation with tribes and state-registered apprenticeship programs.

(2) The office shall determine apprenticeship assistance awarding priorities and award amounts for eligible participants in collaboration with the tribes and state-registered apprenticeship programs.

(a) For eligible participants attending a state-registered apprenticeship program, the office shall prioritize funding to cover any tuition costs for related supplemental instruction. Additional funding may be used to provide a grant to cover required supplies, tools, materials, work clothing, and living expenses.

(b) The office may also prioritize funding that secures an eligible participant's grant for the entire length of the participant's program.

[ 2024 c 203 s 3.]